Utah statutes.
59-2-1211.   Commission to provide forms and instructions -- County may prepare forms and instructions -- County legislative body authority to adopt rules or ordinances.

(1)  The commission shall prescribe and make available suitable forms and instructions for:

(a)  claimants; and

(b)  counties.

(2)  A county is not required to use the forms and instructions prescribed by the commission under Subsection (1) if the county prepares suitable forms and instructions for a claimant consistent with:

(a)  this chapter; and

(b)  rules adopted by the commission.

(3)  The county legislative body may adopt rules or ordinances to:

(a)  effectuate the property tax relief under this part; and

(b)  designate one or more persons to perform the functions given the county under this part.



Amended by Chapter 221, 2001 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 310, 2001 General Session

